en: E414a, E414a food additive
xx: E414a
fi: E414a, Oktenyylimeripihkahappo, muunnettu arabikumi, Oktenyylimeripihkahappoa, muunnettua arabikumia
fr: E414a, Acide octénylsuccinique, gomme arabique modifiée

en: E415, Xanthan gum, xanthan, E-415, e 415
xx: E415
ar: E415, صمغ الكزانتان
bg: E415, Гума ксантан, Ксантанова гума, ксантан, ксантан гума
ca: E415, Goma de xantè, goma de xante, goma xantana
cs: E415, Xanthan, Xanthanová guma, Xantan
da: E415, xanthangummi, xanthan-gummi
de: E415, Xanthan, Xanthangummi, E 415, Xantan
el: E415, Ξανθανικο κομμι, uc
es: E415, Goma xantana, Xantano, Xantana, goma de xantano, goma xantica, E 415
et: E415, Ksantaankummi, Ksantaan
fa: E415, صمغ زانتان
fi: E415, Ksantaanikumi, Ksantaanikumia
fr: E415, Gomme xanthane, gomme de xanthane, gomme de maïs, gommes xanthane, gommes de xanthane, Xanthane, CAS 11138-66-2, Xanthan gum, goma xantana, xantano, Gummi xanthanum, Xanthomonas gum, 11138-66-2, C35H49O29
gl: E415, Xantano
he: E415, קסנטן גאם
hr: E415, ksantan, ksantan gum, ksantan guma, zgušnjivač ksantan guma
hu: E415, Xantángumi, xantán gumi
id: E415, Gum xanthan
it: E415, Gomma di xantano, gomma di xanthan, Resina di xantano, E145
ja: E415, キサンタンガム, キサンタン
lt: E415, Ksantano derva
lv: E415, Ksantāna sveķi
mt: E415, Gomma xanthan
nb: E415, Xantangummi
nl: E415, Xanthaangom, Xanthaan, Xanthan, Xanthangom
nn: E415, xanthan gum
no: E415, xantangummi
pl: E415, Guma ksantanowa
pt: E415, Goma xantana, goma xanthano
ro: E415, Gumă de xantan, gumă xantan
ru: E415, Ксантановая камедь, Ксантан, Е415
sk: E415, Xantánová živica
sl: E415, Ksantan gumi
sv: E415, Xantangummi, Xantan, Xanthangummi
tr: E415, Ksantan zamkı, Ksantan gam, Ksantan gum, Ksantan gamı
zh: E415, 黄原胶

en: E416, Karaya-gum, Katilo, Kadaya, Gum sterculia, Sterculia, Karaya, gum karaya, Kullo
xx: E416
bg: E416, Гума карая, Катило, кадая, гума sterculia, Sterculia, карая, гума карая, куло
ca: E416, Goma de karaya
cs: E416, Guma karaya, Katilo, kadaya, guma sterculia, karaya, kullo
da: E416, Karaya-gum
de: E416, Karaya-gummi, Sterculia-Gummi, Karaya, E 416, Sterculiagummi, Indischer Traganth, Sterkuliagummi, Karayagummi, Sterkulia-Gummi
el: E416, Κομμι καραγια, Katilo, kadaya, κόμμι στερκουλίας, sterculia, karaya, kullo
es: E416, Goma karaya, Katilo, kadaya, goma de Sterculia, Sterculia, Karaya, kullo, E 416
et: E416, Karaiakummi
fi: E416, Karaijakumi, Katilo, Kadaya, Sterculia-kumi, Sterculia, Karaija, Kullo, Karaijakumia, Sterculia-kumia
fr: E416, Gomme karaya, Katilo, Kadaya, Gomme sterculia, Sterculia, Karaya, Kullo, Kuterra, Gomme de Sterculia
hu: E416, Karayagumi, Katilo, Kadaya, Sterculia-gumi, Sterculia, Karaya, Gumi-Karaya Kullo, Karaya-gumi
it: E416, Gomma karaya, Katilo, Kadaya, Gomma sterculia, Sterculia, Karaya, gomma karaya, Kullo
lt: E416, Karaja derva, Katilo, Kadaya, sterkulijų derva, Sterculia, Karaya derva, Kullo, Sterkulijų lipai
lv: E416, Karaja sveķi, Katilo, Kadaja, Sterculia sveķi, Sterculia, Karaja, Karaja sveķi, Kullo
mt: E416, Gomma tal-karaya, Katilo Kadaya, Gomma sterculia, Sterculia, Karaya, gomma tal-karaya, Kullo
nl: E416, Karayagom, Katilo, kadaya, sterculiagom, Sterculia, karaya, gom karaya kullo
pl: E416, Guma karaya, Katilo, Kadaya, Guma sterculia, Sterculia, Karaya, Kullo
pt: E416, Goma karaya, Katilo, kadaya, goma sterculia, Sterculia, Karaya, Kullo
ro: E416, Gumă karaya, Katilo, Kadaya, Gumă sterculia, Sterculia, Karaya, gumă Karaya, Kullo
sk: E416, Guma karaya, Katilo, Kadaya, Guma sterculia, Sterculia, Karaya, guma karaya, Kullo
sl: E416, Karaja gumi, Katilo, Kadaya, gum sterculia, Sterculia, Karaya, karaja gumi, Kullo
sv: E416, Karayagummi

en: E417, Tara gum
xx: E417
bg: E417, Гума тара
ca: E417, Goma tara
cs: E417, Guma tara
da: E417, Taragummi
de: E417, Tarakernmehl
el: E417, Κομμι ταρα
es: E417, Goma tara
et: E417, Tarakummi
fi: E417, Tarakumi, Tarakumia
fr: E417, Gomme tara, caroube du pérou, CAS 39300-88-4, Tara gum
hr: E417
hu: E417, Taramagliszt, Taramag liszt
it: E417, Gomma di tara
lt: E417, Tara derva
lv: E417, Tara sveķi
mt: E417, Gomma tara
nl: E417, Taragom
pl: E417, Guma tara
pt: E417, Goma de tara
ro: E417, Gumă tara
sk: E417, Guma tara
sl: E417, Tara gumi
sv: E417, Taragummi, Tarakärnmjöl

en: E418, Gellan gum, gellan, E-418, E 418, INS418, INS-418, INS 418
xx: E418
ar: E418, صمغ الجيلان
bg: E418, Гума джелан
ca: E418, Goma gellan
cs: E418, Guma gellan
da: E418, Gellangummi
de: E418, Gellan, E 418
el: E418, Κομμι τζελαν
es: E418, Goma gellan, goma gellana, goma gelana, goma de gelana
et: E418, Gellankummi
fi: E418, Gellaanikumi, Gellaanikumia, gellaani
fr: E418, Gomme gellane, Gomme de gellane, gellan gum, E-418, 71010-52-1
hr: E418, gelan guma, gellan guma
hu: E418, Gellángumi
it: E418, Gomma di gellano, gomma gellano
ja: E418, ゲランガム
lt: E418, Gelano derva
lv: E418, Želena sveķi
mt: E418, Gomma ġellan
nl: E418, Gellangom
pl: E418, Guma gellan
pt: E418, Goma gelana
ro: E418, Gumă gellan
sk: E418, Guma gellan
sl: E418, Gelanski gumi
sv: E418, Gellangummi
zh: E418, 結蘭膠

en: E418(i)
xx: E418(i)

en: E418(ii), Low-acyl clarified gellan gum
xx: E418(ii)

en: E419, Gum ghatti
xx: E419
ar: E419, صمغ غاتي
az: E419, Qatti saqqızı
bg: E419, Гума гати
ca: E419, Goma ghatti
cs: E419, Guma ghatti
da: E419, Ghattigummi
de: E419, Ghatti-Gummi
el: E419, Κόμμι γκάτι
eo: E419, Gati-gumo
es: E419, Goma ghatti
et: E419, Ghattikumi
fa: E419, صمغ گتی
fi: E419, Ghatti-kumi, Ghatti-kumia
fr: E419, Gomme ghatti
he: E419, מסטיק גהאטי
hi: E419, घट्टी गोंद
hr: E419, Ghatti guma
hu: E419, Ghatti gumi
id: E419, Gum ghatti
it: E419, Gomma ghatti
ja: E419, ガッティガム
ko: E419, 가티 검
lt: E419, Ghati guma
lv: E419, Ghati sveķi
mk: E419, Гати гума
ms: E419, Gam ghatti
mt: E419, Gomma ghatti
nl: E419, Ghatti gom
pl: E419, Guma ghatti
pt: E419, Goma ghatti
ro: E419, Gumă ghatti
ru: E419, Камедь гхатти
sk: E419, Guma ghatti
sl: E419, Gumi ghatti
sr: E419, Гати гума
sv: E419, Ghattigummi
tr: E419, Gati zamkı
uk: E419, Камедь гатті
zh: E419, 胶凝集素

en: E420, Sorbitol, glucitol
xx: E420
bg: E420, Сорбитол, сорбитоли
ca: E420, Sorbitol
cs: E420, Sorbitol, Sorbit
da: E420, Sorbitol
de: E420, Sorbit, Glucitol, Hexanhexol, Hexanhexaol, Sorbitol
el: E420, Σορβιτολη
es: E420, Sorbitol, Glucitol, sorbitoles
et: E420, sorbitool
fi: E420, Sorbitoli, Glusitoli, Sorbitolia, Glusitolia, Sorbitolit, Sorbitoleja
fr: E420, Sorbitol, sorbitols, Glucitol, Gulitol
hr: E420, sorbitol, sorbitoli
hu: E420, Szorbit, szorbitol
it: E420, Sorbitolo, sorbitoli, Glucitolo
ja: E420, ソルビトール
lt: E420, Sorbitolis
lv: E420, sorbitolis, Sorbīts
mt: E420, sorbitol
nb: E420, Sorbitol
nl: E420, Sorbitol, Sorbitolen
pl: E420, Sorbitole, Sorbitol
pt: E420, Sorbitol, sorbitóis
ro: E420, Sorbitol
ru: E420, Сорбит, сорбитовый сироп, Сорбитол, Глюцит
sk: E420, Sorbitol
sl: E420, Sorbitol
sv: E420, Sorbitol, D-sorbitol, D-glukitol, Sorbitoler
tr: E420, Sorbitol, Sorbitol şurubu

en: E420(i), D-sorbitol, D-glucitol
xx: E420(i)
bg: E420(i), D-глюцитол
cs: E420(i), D-glucitol
da: E420(i), D-Sorbitol
de: E420(i), D-Glucitol
el: E420(i), D-γλυκιτόλη
es: E420(i), D-Sorbitol
et: E420(i), D-glütsitool
fi: E420(i), D-glusitoli, D-glusitolia
fr: E420(i), D-glucitol
hr: E420(i)
hu: E420(i), D-Szorbit
it: E420(i), D-glucitolo
lt: E420(i), D-gliucitolis
lv: E420(i), D-glucīts
mt: E420(i), D-gluċitol
nl: E420(i), D-glucitol
pl: E420(i), D-Sorbitol
pt: E420(i), D-sorbitol
ro: E420(i), D-sorbitol
sl: E420(i), D-Sorbitol
sv: E420(i), D-glucitol

en: E420(ii), Sorbitol syrup
xx: E420(ii)
bg: E420(ii), сорбитол сироп
cs: E420(ii), Sorbitol sirup
da: E420(ii), Sorbitolsirup
de: E420(ii), Sorbitsirup
el: E420(ii), Σιροπι σορβιτολης
es: E420(ii), Jarabe de sorbitol
et: E420(ii), sorbitoolisiirup
fi: E420(ii), Sorbitolisiirappi, Sorbitolisiirappia
fr: E420(ii), sirop de sorbitol
hr: E420(ii)
hu: E420(ii), Szorbitszirup
it: E420(ii), sciroppo di sorbitolo
lt: E420(ii), sorbitolio sirupas
lv: E420(ii), Sorbīta sīrups
mt: E420(ii), ġulepp tas-sorbitol
nl: E420(ii), Sorbitolstroop
pl: E420(ii), Syrop sorbitolowy
pt: E420(ii), xarope de sorbitol
ro: E420(ii), Sirop de sorbitol
sk: E420(ii), sorbitolový sirup
sl: E420(ii), Sirup sorbitola
sv: E420(ii), Sorbitolsirap

en: E421, Mannitol
xx: E421
ar: E421, مانيتول
bg: E421, манитол
ca: E421, Mannitol
cs: E421, Mannitol
cy: E421, mannitol
da: E421, Mannitol
de: E421, Mannit, D-Mannitol, Mannitol, Bronchitol
el: E421, Μαννιτολη
es: E421, Manitol
et: E421, mannitool
eu: E421, manitol
fa: E421, مانیتول
fi: E421, Mannitoli, Mannitolia
fr: E421, Mannitol, mannitol
ga: E421, mainníotól
gl: E421, Manitol
he: E421, מניטול
hr: E421, manit, manitol
hu: E421, Mannit
it: E421, mannitolo, Mannite, D-(-)-mannitolo
ja: E421, マンニトール
ko: E421, 만니톨
lt: E421, manitolis, Manitas
lv: E421, Mannīts
mt: E421, mannitol
nb: E421, Mannitol
nl: E421, Mannitol, Hexitol
or: E421, ମାନିଟଲ
pl: E421, Mannitol, Mannit
pt: E421, manitol, Mannitol
ro: E421, manitol
sh: E421, Manitol
sk: E421, manitol
sl: E421, Manitol
sr: E421, манитол
sv: E421, Mannitol
uk: E421, Манітол
vi: E421, Mannitol
zh: E421, 甘露醇

en: E422, Glycerol, Glycerin, Glycerine, vegetable glycerine, vegetable glycerin
xx: E422
ar: E422, غليسرول
as: E422, গ্লিচাৰল
az: E422, Qliserin
be: E422, Гліцэрын
bg: E422, Глицерол, Глицерин
bn: E422, গ্লিসারল
bs: E422, Glicerol
ca: E422, Glicerol, glicerina
cs: E422, Glycerol, glycerín
da: E422, Glycerol, Glycerin
de: E422, Glycerin, Glycerol, glyzerin
el: E422, Γλυκερολη, Γλυκερίνη, Προπανοτριόλη
eo: E422, glicerolo
es: E422, Glicerol, glicerina
et: E422, Glütserool, glütseriin
eu: E422, glizerina
fa: E422, گلیسیرین
fi: E422, Glyseroli, Glyserolia, kasviperäinen glyseroli
fr: E422, Glycérol, Trihydroxypropane, glycérine, humectant glycérol, glycérol de colza, glycérol d'origine végétale
ga: E422, Gliocról
gl: E422, Glicerol
gv: E422, glisreen
he: E422, גליצרול
hi: E422, ग्लीसरीन
hr: E422, Glicerol, glicerin
hu: E422, Glicerin, Glycerol
hy: E422, Գլիցերին
id: E422, Gliserol
io: E422, Glicerolo
is: E422, Glýseról
it: E422, Glicerolo, glicerina
ja: E422, グリセリン
kk: E422, Глицерин
ko: E422, 글리세롤
ky: E422, Глицерин
lb: E422, Glycerol
lt: E422, Glicerolis
lv: E422, Glicerīns
mk: E422, глицерол
ml: E422, ഗ്ലിസറിൻ
ms: E422, Gliserol
mt: E422, Gliċerol, Gliċerin
my: E422, ဂလစ်ဆရင်း
nb: E422, Glycerol
ne: E422, ग्लिसेरोल
nl: E422, Glycerol, glycerine
nn: E422, glyserol
oc: E422, Gliceròl
pl: E422, Glicerol, Gliceryna
pt: E422, Glicerol, glicerina
ro: E422, Glicerol, Glicerolul, glicerină
ru: E422, глицерин
sh: E422, Glicerol
sk: E422, Glycerol, Glycerín
sl: E422, Glicerol, glicerin
sr: E422, глицерол
su: Gliserol
sv: E422, Glycerol, Propantriol, glycerin
ta: E422, கிளிசரால்
tr: E422, Gliserin
tt: E422, гөлсирин
uk: E422, Гліцерин
vi: E422, glyxêrin
zh: E422, 甘油

en: E424, Curdlan
xx: E424
ar: E424, كوردلان
az: E424, Kürdlan
bg: E424, Кърдлан
ca: E424, Curdlan
cs: E424, Curdlan
da: E424, Curdlan
de: E424, Curdlan
el: E424, Κουρντλάν
eo: E424, Kurdlano
es: E424, Curdlan
et: E424, Kurdlaan
fi: E424, Curdlan
fr: E424, Curdlan
he: E424, קורדלן
hi: E424, कर्डलन
hr: E424, Kurdlan
hu: E424, Curdlan
id: E424, Curdlan
it: E424, Curdlan
ja: E424, カードラン
ko: E424, 커들란
lt: E424, Kurdlanas
lv: E424, Kurdlāns
mk: E424, Курдлан
ms: E424, Curdlan
mt: E424, Kurdlan
nl: E424, Curdlan
pl: E424, Curdlan
pt: E424, Curdlana
ro: E424, Curdlan
ru: E424, Курдлан
sk: E424, Curdlan
sl: E424, Curdlan
sr: E424, Курдлан
sv: E424, Curdlan
th: E424, เคอร์แดลน
tr: E424, Kurdlan
uk: E424, Курдлан
zh: E424, 凝胶多糖

en: E425, Konjac
xx: E425
ca: E425, Konjac
fi: E425, Konjak
fr: E425, extrait de racine de Konjac
hu: E425, Konjak
pl: E425, Konjac, Konjak

en: E425(i), Konjac gum, Konjak gum
xx: E425(i)
bg: E425(i), Коняк гума
cs: E425(i), Konjaková guma
da: E425(i), Konjacgummi
de: E425(i), Konjakgummi
el: E425(i), Κομμι konjac
es: E425(i), Goma konjac
et: E425(i), Rivieri titaanjuure kummi
fi: E425(i), Konjak-hartsi, Konjak-hartsia, Konjakkikumi
fr: E425(i), Gomme de konjac
hr: E425(i), konjak guma
hu: E425(i), Konjakgyanta
it: E425(i), Gomma di konjac
lt: E425(i), Konjako derva
lv: E425(i), "konjac" sveķi
mt: E425(i), Gomma konjac
nl: E425(i), Konjacgom
pl: E425(i), Guma konjac, Guma konjak
pt: E425(i), Goma de konjac
ro: E425(i), Gumă konjac
ru: E425(i), загуститель конжаковая камедь
sk: E425(i), Konjaková guma
sl: E425(i), Konjac gumi
sv: E425(i), Konjakgummi, Konjaksgummi

en: E425(ii), Konjac glucomannan
xx: E425(ii)
bg: E425(ii), Коняк глюкоманан
cs: E425(ii), Konjakový glukomannan
da: E425(ii), Konjacglucomannan
de: E425(ii), Konjak-glucomannan
el: E425(ii), Γλυκομαννανη konjac
es: E425(ii), Glucomanano de konjac
et: E425(ii), Rivieri titaanjuure glükomannaan
fi: E425(ii), Konjak-glukomannaani, Konjak-glukomannaania
fr: E425(ii), Glucomannane de konjac
hu: E425(ii), Konjak-glükomannán
it: E425(ii), Glucomannano di konjac
lt: E425(ii), Konjako gliukomananas
lv: E425(ii), "konjac" glikomannāns
mt: E425(ii), Glukomannan tal-konjac
nl: E425(ii), Konjacglucomannaan
pl: E425(ii), Glukomannan konjac
pt: E425(ii), Glucomanano de konjac
ro: E425(ii), Glucomanan konjac
sk: E425(ii), Konjak glukomanan
sl: E425(ii), Konjac glukomanan
sv: E425(ii), Konjakglukomannan

en: E426, Soybean hemicellulose
xx: E426
bg: E426, Соева хемицелулоза
ca: E426, Hemicel·lulosa de soja
cs: E426, Sójová hemicelulosa
da: E426, Sojabønnehemicellulose
de: E426, Sojabohnen-polyose
el: E426, Ημικυτταρινη σογιας
es: E426, Hemicelulosa de soja
et: E426, Soja hemitselluloos
fi: E426, Soijapapuhemiselluloosa, Soijapapuhemiselluloosaa
fr: E426, Hémicellulose de soja
hr: E246, hemiceluloza
hu: E426, Szója-hemicellulóz
it: E426, Emicellulosa di soia
lt: E426, Sojų hemiceliuliozė
lv: E426, Sojas pupiņu hemiceluloze
mt: E426, Emiċelluloża tas-sojja
nl: E426, Hemicellulose van soja
pl: E426, Hemiceluloza sojowa
pt: E426, Hemicelulose de soja
ro: E426, Hemiceluloză de soia
sk: E426, Sójová hemicelulóza
sl: E426, Hemiceluloza iz soje
sv: E426, Sojabönshemicellulosa

en: E427, Cassia gum
xx: E427
bg: E427, Гума касия
ca: E427, Goma de càssia, goma de cassia
cs: E427, Guma cassia synonyma
da: E427, Cassiagummi
de: E427, Cassia-gummi
el: E427, Κομμι κασσιας
es: E427, Goma casia, Goma cassia
et: E427, Kassiakummi
fi: E427, Kassiakumi, Kassiakumia
fr: E427, Gomme de casse, Gomme cassia, Gomme casse, E 427, 51434-18-5
hu: E427, Kassziagumi
it: E427, Gomma cassia
lt: E427, Kasijos derva, Velniapupių lipai
lv: E427, Kasijas sveķi
mt: E427, Gomma tal-kassja
nl: E427, Cassiagom, Cassiagom is het gemalen
pl: E427, Guma kasja, Guma kasja to mielone
pt: E427, Goma de cássia
ro: E427, Gumă cassia
sk: E427, Kasia guma
sl: E427, Gumi kasijevca
sv: E427, Cassiagummi

en: E428, Gelatine, gelatin
xx: E428
ar: E428, جيلاتين
az: E428, Jelatin
be: E428, Жэлацін
bg: E428, Желатин
bn: E428, জেলাটিন
br: E428, gelatin
bs: E428, Želatin
ca: E428, gelatina
cs: E428, želatina
cv: E428, Желатин
cy: E428, Gelatin
da: E428, gelatine, Husblas
de: E428, Gelatine, Speisegelatine, Gelatinpulver, Gelatinieren
el: E428, ζελατίνη
eo: E428, gelateno
es: E428, Gelatina, Gelatinosa, Grenetina, Gelatinoso
et: E428, želatiin
eu: E428, Gelatina
fa: E428, ژلاتین
fi: E428, Liivate, Gelatiini, Liivatejauhe, Liivatetta, Gelatiinia, Liivatejauhetta
fr: E428, Gélatine, gélatine alimentaire
fy: E428, sjelatine
ga: E428, Geilitín
gl: E428, Xelatina
he: E428, ג'לטין
hi: E428, जिलेटिन
hr: E428, želatina, jestiva želatina
hu: E428, Zselatin
id: E428, Gelatin
io: E428, Gelatino
it: E428, Gelatina
ja: E428, ゼラチン
jv: E428, Gelatin
ka: E428, ჟელატინი
kk: E428, Желатин
ko: E428, 젤라틴
ky: E428, Желатина
la: E428, Gelatinum
li: E428, sjilletien
lt: E428, Želatina
mk: E428, Желатин
ms: E428, Gelatin
my: E428, ဂျယ်လတင်း
nb: E428, gelatin
ne: E428, geltain
nl: E428, Gelatine
oc: E428, Gelatina
pa: E428, ਸਰੇਸ਼
pl: E428, Żelatyna, Gelatin
ps: E428, ژلاتین
pt: E428, Gelatina
ro: E428, Gelatină
ru: E428, желатин, пищевой желатин
sk: E428, Želatína
sl: E428, Želatina
sq: E428, xhelatinë
sr: E428, Желатин
sv: E428, gelatin
th: E428, เจลาติน
tr: E428, Jelatin
uk: E428, Желатин
vi: E428, Gelatin
zh: E428, 明膠